District of Columbia statutes.
32-1331.03

Deemed employers.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the officers of a corporation and any agents having the management thereof who knowingly permit the corporation to violate this subchapter shall be deemed to be the employers of the employees of the corporation.

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 976, ch. 924, § 203
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-300, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2679
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-300 added this section.